Massachusetts, session 194th, H1025.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 58 of chapter 131 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following words after "thereof.":-
"Provided further that any persons hunting migratory game birds from a watercraft or any
boat or floating device propelled by sail, steam, naphtha, gasoline, electricity, compressed air or
similar motive power, shall not discharge any firearm within one thousand feet of the coastal
shoreline."
SECTION 2. Section 65 of chapter 131 of the General Law is hereby amended by
inserting the following words after "blind":- ", provided further that any water craft used for said
hunting purposes shall not be within one thousand feet of the coastal shoreline;"
of 1